hu: Vonószőr színe: Fekete; Vegyes; Fehér (szőkített); Fehér (nem szőkített/természetes); Egyéb
vi: Màu lông cung: Màu đen; Hỗn hợp; Màu trắng (đã tẩy); Màu trắng (chưa tẩy/tự nhiên); Khác
zh-TW: 蝴蝶結毛顏色: 黑色; 混合色; 白色 (漂白); 白色 (未漂白/天然); 其他
nl: Strijkstok haarkleur: Zwart; Gemengd; Wit (gebleekt); Wit (ongebleekt/natuurlijk); Overige
ro-RO: Culoare păr arcuș: Negru; Mixt; Alb (decolorat); Alb (nedecolorat/natural); Altele
it: colore dei capelli del fiocco: Nero; Misto; Bianco (sbiancato); Bianco (non sbiancato/naturale); Altro
sv: Båghårsfärg: Svart; Blandad; Vit (blekt); Vit (oblekt/naturlig); Annan
sk-SK: Farba vlásia sláčika: Čierna; Zmiešaná; Biela (bielená); Biela (nebielená/prírodná); Iná
nb: Farget sløyfehår: Svart; Blandet; Hvit (bleket); Hvit (ubleket/naturlig); Annet
ko: 활털 색상: 검정색; 혼합; 흰색(표백); 흰색(무표백/천연); 기타
sl-SI: Barva pentlje za lase: Črna; Mešana; Bela (beljena); Bela (nebeljena/naravna); Drugo
bg-BG: Цвят на косъма на лъка: Черен; Смесен; Бял (избелен); Бял (неизбелен/естествен); Друго
hr-HR: Boja mašne za kosu: Crna; Miješana; Bijela (izbijeljena); Bijela (neizbijeljena/prirodna); Ostalo
de: Farbe des Bogenhaars: Schwarz; Gemischt; Weiß (gebleicht); Weiß (ungebleicht/natürlich); Sonstige
es: Color del pelo del arco: Negro; Mixto; Blanco (decolorado); Blanco (sin decolorar/natural); Otro
fi: Rusetin hiusväri: Musta; Sekaväri; Valkoinen (valkaistu); Valkoinen (valkaisematon/luonnollinen); Muu
ja: リボンの髪の色: 黒; ミックス; 白（漂白）; 白（無漂白/ナチュラル）; その他
ru: Цвет волоса смычка: Чёрный; Смешанный; Белый (отбеленный); Белый (неотбеленный/натуральный); Другое
el: Χρώμα τριχών δοξαριού: Μαύρο; Μεικτό; Λευκό (λευκασμένο); Λευκό (αλεύκαστο/φυσικό); Άλλο
zh-CN: 弓毛颜色: 黑色; 混合色; 白色（漂白）; 白色（未漂白/自然色）; 其他
da: Hårfarve til buer: Sort; Blandet; Hvid (bleget); Hvid (ubleget/naturlig); Andet
pt-BR: Cor do cabelo do arco: Preto; Misto; Branco (descolorido); Branco (não descolorido/natural); Outros
lt-LT: Lanko ašutų spalva: Juoda; Mišri; Balta (balinta); Balta (nebalinta / natūrali); Kita
pt-PT: Cor do cabelo do laço: Preto; Misto; Branco (descolorado); Branco (não descolorado/natural); Outro
pl: Kolor włosia smyczka: Czarne; Mieszane; Białe (wybielane); Białe (niewybielane/naturalne); Inne
cs: Barva žíní smyčce: Černá; Smíšená; Bílá (bělená); Bílá (nebělená/přírodní); Jiné
fr: Couleur de la mèche de l’archet: Noir; Mixte; Blanc (décoloré); Blanc (non décoloré/naturel); Autre
th: สีขนคันชัก: สีดำ; คละสี; สีขาว (ฟอกสี); สีขาว (ไม่ฟอกสี/ธรรมชาติ); อื่นๆ
tr: Yay kılı rengi: Siyah; Karışık; Beyaz (ağartılmış); Beyaz (ağartılmamış/doğal); Diğer
en: Bow hair color: Black; Mixed; White (bleached); White (unbleached/natural); Other